Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-706.14
Tuberculin; injection or application; limitations.

(1) No person other than an accredited veterinarian shall inject or apply tuberculin into or on any animal.

(2) No person, including a veterinarian, shall inject or apply tuberculin into or on any animal for the purpose of plugging, for the purpose of fraudulently concealing the presence of bovine tuberculosis in such animal, or for the purpose of preventing future reactions to tuberculin.

Laws 2007, LB110, § 14.